Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-955
Public buildings; maintenance; tax.

The mayor and city council of cities of the second class and chairperson and village board of trustees of villages shall have the power to levy an annual tax not to exceed seven cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of the taxable property in such cities or villages for the purpose of maintaining an auditorium, municipal building, or community house and shall, by ordinance, determine and declare how such auditorium, municipal building, or community house shall be managed.

Laws 1935, c. 37, § 3, p. 152;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-169;

R.S.1943, § 17-955;

Laws 1947, c. 40, § 3, p. 155;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 24, p. 930;

Laws 1957, c. 35, § 1, p. 199;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 63;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 9;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 288.
August 24, 2017